Maryland, session 2025, HB0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–609.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Personal identifying information” has the meaning stated in §
8–301 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) “Personal identifying information” includes an Electronic
Benefits Transfer card number or personal identification number.
(3) “Skimming practices” includes:
(i) use of a skimming device, including a scanner, skimmer, reader,
or other electronic device used to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily
or permanently, personal identifying information; or
(ii) adding malicious code illegally to a website to capture Electronic
Benefits Transfer card data or personal identifying information.
(4) “Theft” includes:
(i) physical theft of an Electronic Benefits Transfer card;
(ii) identity fraud, as defined in § 8–301 of the Criminal Law Article;
and
(iii) theft through skimming practices.
(5) “Two–way fraud alert” means the capability of the Department to
communicate with households, and of households to communicate with the Department,
through text messaging regarding potential fraudulent use or theft of an Electronic
Benefits Transfer card.
(b) (1) If an investigation by the Department shows a household’s correctly
issued benefits were lost due to theft, the Department [automatically] shall, SUBJECT TO
THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 5–610 OF THIS SUBTITLE, restore the benefits without
requiring further action from the household.

HOUSE BILL 175 3
(2) As soon as practicable, but not later than 10 days after a household
informs the Department of the loss of benefits due to theft, the Department shall:
(i) notify the household in writing of the Department’s decision as
to whether to restore benefits, the amount of benefits to be restored, and the right to and
method of requesting a hearing on the Department’s decision in accordance with subsection
(c) of this section;
(ii) if the Department determines that the household receives
benefits, restore benefits to the household in the amount of benefits that was lost; and
(iii) provide the household with a new Electronic Benefits Transfer
card.
(3) The Department may not:
(i) require a household to provide a police report as a condition of
restoration of benefits; or
(ii) limit the number of months in which a household can receive
restoration of benefits lost due to theft.
(c) (1) If a household disputes the amount of benefits restored or the
Department’s determination that no restoration is due, the household may request a
hearing with the Department within 90 days after the date of the Department’s
determination.
(2) If a household requests a hearing under this subsection, the
Department shall restore the benefits for which the household claims entitlement while the
hearing is pending.
(3) If the hearing decision is unfavorable to the household, any benefits
improperly restored under paragraph (2) of this subsection may be recovered by the
Department by reducing the household’s benefit at a rate that may not exceed the lesser of
$10 or 5% of the household’s monthly allotment of benefits.
(d) In the procurement process for electronic benefits distribution or
administration, the State or State–aided or State–controlled entity shall give preference to
a vendor that:
(1) holds a form of insurance that can be used to reimburse a beneficiary
for identity fraud or theft; and
(2) provides identity access protections to protect an eligible beneficiary
against identity fraud and theft, which may include multifactor authentication.

HOUSE BILL 175
(e) The Department shall coordinate with vendors to take available precautions
to reduce the vulnerability of Electronic Benefits Transfer cards to theft by utilizing
enhanced technology.
(F) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET AND
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RESTORE BENEFITS
TO A HOUSEHOLD AS PROVIDED FOR BY AN APPROPRIATION FOR THE PURPOSES OF
ELECTRONIC BENEFIT THEFT RESTORATION.
[(f)] (G) On or before December 1 each year, the Department, in consultation
with local law enforcement agencies in the State, shall report to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the accessibility and security of Electronic Benefits Transfer cards;
(2) actions taken to reduce the fraudulent use of Electronic Benefits
Transfer cards;
(3) the number of Electronic Benefits Transfer cards reissued due to fraud
in the immediately preceding year;
(4) the number of households reporting theft of benefits, by jurisdiction and
program;
(5) the number of households eligible for expedited Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits that reported loss of benefits due to theft, by
jurisdiction and program;
(6) the total dollar amount of benefits reported lost due to theft, by
jurisdiction and program;
(7) the number of determinations of theft made by the Department, by
jurisdiction;
(8) the number of determinations made by the Department that theft did
not occur, by jurisdiction;
(9) the number of households reimbursed for benefits lost due to theft and
the total dollar amount of benefits restored, by jurisdiction and program;
(10) the average and maximum length of time, in days, between the report
of theft and the restoration of benefits, by jurisdiction;
(11) the number of hearings requested and the number of households that
received a restoration of benefits as an outcome of a hearing, by jurisdiction; and

HOUSE BILL 175 5
(12) demographic data on households that experienced theft, including race,
gender, number of households with children under the age of 18 years, and number of
households with a member at least 60 years old.
5–610.
(a) The Department [may] SHALL:
(1) restore benefits to any household that lost benefits due to theft that
occurred between January 1, 2021, and [October 1, 2022] JULY 1, 2025, both inclusive,
provided that the Department confirms the household lost benefits due to theft during that
time period; and
(2) support innovative practices required to support beneficiaries during
the time period between the reporting of the loss of benefits due to theft and the restoration
of benefits.
(b) On or before [September 1, 2023] SEPTEMBER 30, 2026, the Department
shall issue benefits to households eligible to receive funds under subsection (a) of this
section.
(C) ANY CLAIM FOR THE RESTORATION OF LOST BENEFITS DUE TO THEFT
THAT OCCURRED BETWEEN JANUARY 1, 2021, AND JULY 1, 2025, BOTH INCLUSIVE,
SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026.
(D) ANY RESTORATION OF LOST BENEFITS DUE TO THEFT IN THIS SECTION
IS SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – Financial Institutions
1–401.
(d) (1) “Automated teller machine” means any electronic information
processing device located in this State which [accepts]:
(I) ACCEPTS or dispenses cash in connection with a credit, deposit,
or convenience account; AND
(II) PROCESSES AND DISPENSES CASH FROM AN ELECTRONIC
BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD.
(2) “Automated teller machine” does not include devices used:
(i) Solely to facilitate check guarantees or check authorizations;

HOUSE BILL 175
(ii) In connection with the acceptance or dispensing of cash on a
person–to–person basis, including by a store cashier; or
(iii) For the payment of goods or services.
1–407.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, EACH OPERATOR OF AN AUTOMATED
TELLER MACHINE SHALL ENSURE THAT THE MACHINE HAS THE FUNCTIONALITY TO
PROCESS AND DISPENSE CASH FROM AN ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.